Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 10

Individual Development Account Demonstration Projects

71-3-1001. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to create an opportunity for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), or successor program, recipients to build assets as a transition to self-sufficiency, to encourage TANF program, or successor program, recipients to secure and maintain employment and to provide the support necessary for TANF program, or successor program, recipients to make the transition from welfare to work.

Acts 1996, ch. 989, § 1.

71-3-1002. Individual development account demonstration projects.

Six (6) urban and six (6) rural communities in Tennessee, two (2) of each in each grand division, will participate in an individual development account (IDA) demonstration project.

Acts 1996, ch. 989, § 2.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, chapter 1, part 2.

71-3-1003. Individual development accounts.

In the selected communities, temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or successor program, recipients may deposit up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) in special savings accounts for career development goals for post-secondary education of themselves or their children, small business development, home ownership purposes or transportation needs. For the period the participant is eligible for the TANF program, or successor program, the individual development account (IDA) shall not be considered when computing the asset limit of the participant when determining the participant's eligibility for the TANF program, or successor program, or food stamps, as permitted by waiver from the federal departments of health and human services and agriculture.

Acts 1996, ch. 989, § 3.

71-3-1004. Matching funds.

The temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), or successor program, recipients who are not employed will not be eligible to receive matching fund donations into their individual development accounts (IDAs).

For those TANF program, or successor program, recipients who secure employment while participating in this project, their IDAs may begin to be matched immediately.

Matching funds may be secured from public and private funds.

For the purposes of this part, public funds utilized to provide such matching funds shall not include state funds.

Acts 1996, ch. 989, § 4; 2000, ch. 894, § 1.

71-3-1005. Eligibility of demonstration project participants.

To be eligible, demonstration project participants must be a member of a group that meets twice a month to make contributions into their individual development accounts (IDAs) and receive support, training and technical assistance to ensure they secure and maintain employment while building their IDA, and must notify the department of human services in advance of establishing such an account.

Acts 1996, ch. 989, § 5.